Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 3. AVIATION

CHAPTER 23. AIRPORT POLICE FORCES

Sec. 23.001. ESTABLISHMENT OF AIRPORT POLICE FORCE; COMMISSIONING OF PEACE OFFICERS. The governing body of a joint board, as defined by Section 22.071, or the governing body of a political subdivision that operates an airport served by an air carrier certificated by the Federal Aviation Administration or the United States Department of Transportation may:

(1) establish an airport police force; and

(2) commission and employ a peace officer, subject to Chapter 1701, Occupations Code, if the employee takes and files the oath required of peace officers.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (S.B. 1550), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.